Illinois, session 104th, HB627.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act 5is amended by changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (310 ILCS 67/1)7    Sec. 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the the 8Affordable Housing Planning and Appeal Act.9(Source: P.A. 93-595, eff. 1-1-04.)